Arkansas, session 2025, HB1251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 95, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 12 – Arkansas Anesthesiologist Assistant Act

17-95-1201. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas
Anesthesiologist Assistant Act”.

17-95-1202. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Anesthesiologist" means a physician who has completed a
residency in anesthesiology and is board eligible or board certified in the
specialty of anesthesiology;
(2) "Anesthesiologist assistant" means a graduate of an approved
*JMB012*
02-13-2025 10:42:10 JMB012

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 HB1251
program who is licensed to perform services delegated and directly supervised
by a supervising anesthesiologist;
(3) “Approved program” means a program for the education and
training of anesthesiologist assistants accredited by the Commission on
Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs; and
(4) “Direct supervision” means the on-site, personal supervision
by an anesthesiologist who is:
(A) Licensed by and in good standing with the Arkansas
State Medical Board;
(B) Present in the office or surgical or obstetrical suite when
a procedure is being performed in the office or surgical or obstetrical
suite; and
(C) In all instances immediately available to provide
assistance and direction to the anesthesiologist assistant while anesthesia
services are being performed.

17-95-1203. Arkansas State Medical Board — Powers and duties under
subchapter.
(a) The Arkansas State Medical Board shall:
(1) License and renew the licenses of qualified applicants under
this subchapter;
(2)(A) Maintain a current list of every person licensed to
practice under this subchapter.
(B) The list under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section
shall show:
(i) The licensee’s last known place of residence;
and
(ii) The date and number of the license;
(3) Discipline persons who violate this subchapter and incur
necessary expenses of the prosecution;
(4) Keep a record of all proceedings of the board under this
subchapter and make the record available to the public for inspection during
reasonable business hours;
(5) Conduct hearings regarding discipline of a licensee under
this subchapter or denial, revocation, or suspension of a license under this
subchapter; and
02-13-2025 10:42:10 JMB012

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 HB1251
(6)(A) Share information on a case-by-case basis of a person
whose license has been suspended, revoked, or denied under this subchapter.
(B) The information under subdivision (a)(6)(A) of this
section shall include:
(i) The name of the person whose license has been
suspended, revoked, or denied;
(ii) The type and cause of the action;
(iii) The date upon which a penalty is imposed;
(iv) The type of penalty imposed; or
(v) The duration of the penalty imposed.
(C) The information under subdivision (a)(6)(A) of this
section shall be available for public inspection during reasonable business
hours and shall be supplied to licensing entities in other states upon
request.
(b) The board may:
(1) Promulgate rules as necessary to enforce this subchapter
consistent with state law;
(2) Employ personnel as necessary to assist the board in
performing its duties under this subchapter;
(3) Establish license renewal requirements and procedures under
this subchapter, including without limitation continuing medical education
hours, as deemed appropriate by the board ;
(4)(A) Secure the services of resource consultants as deemed
necessary by the board in performing its duties under this subchapter.
(B) The board shall reimburse resource consultants for all
actual and necessary expenses incurred while engaged in consultative service
to the board; and
(5) Establish and assess fees under this subchapter by rule.

17-95-1204. Licensing.
(a) A person applying for licensure as an anesthesiologist assistant
under this subchapter shall submit an application to the Arkansas State
Medical Board on forms approved by the board.
(b) An application under this section is not effective for more than
one (1) year from the date of the original submission of the application and
fee, after which time an applicant shall submit to the board a new
02-13-2025 10:42:10 JMB012

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 HB1251
application and fee.
(c)(1) To qualify for licensure under this subchapter, an applicant
under this section shall obtain a passing score on the examination
administered through the National Commission for Certification of
Anesthesiologist Assistants.
(2) A passing score under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
shall be established by the National Commission for Certification of
Anesthesiologist Assistants.

17-95-1205. Supervisory relationship.
(a) An anesthesiologist or anesthesiologist group, upon entering into
a supervisory relationship with a licensed anesthesiologist assistant, shall
file with the Arkansas State Medical Board a written protocol, including
without limitation:
(1) The name, address, and license number of the
anesthesiologist assistant;
(2) The name, address, license number, and United States Drug
Enforcement Administration registration number of each anesthesiologist who
will supervise the anesthesiologist assistant;
(3) The address of the anesthesiologist assistant’s primary
practice location where the anesthesiologist assistant may practice;
(4) The date the protocol was developed and the date of all
revisions;
(5) The designation and signature of the primary supervising
anesthesiologist;
(6) The signatures of the anesthesiologist assistant and all
supervising anesthesiologists;
(7) The duties and functions of the anesthesiologist assistant;
(8) The conditions or procedures that require the provision of
care by a supervising anesthesiologist; and
(9) The procedures to be followed in the event of an anesthetic
emergency.
(b) The protocol required under subsection (a) of this section shall
be filed with the board before the anesthesiologist assistant begins practice
with the supervising anesthesiologist or anesthesiology group.
(c) An anesthesiologist assistant may perform the following duties
02-13-2025 10:42:10 JMB012

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 HB1251
under the direct supervision of an anesthesiologist:
(1) Obtain a comprehensive patient history and present the
history to the supervising anesthesiologist;
(2) Pretest and calibrate anesthesia delivery systems and
monitor, obtain, and interpret information from the anesthesia delivery
systems;
(3) Assist the supervising anesthesiologist with implementation
of monitoring techniques;
(4) Establish basic and advanced airway interventions, including
intubations of the trachea and performance of ventilator support;
(5) Administer intermittent vasoactive drugs and start and
adjust vasoactive infusions;
(6) Administer anesthetic drugs, adjuvant drugs, and accessory
drugs;
(7) Perform epidural anesthetic procedures and spinal anesthetic
procedures;
(8) Administer blood, blood products, and supportive fluids;
(9) Support life functions during the administration of
anesthesia, including without limitation induction and intubation procedures,
the use of appropriate mechanical supportive devices, and the management of
fluids, electrolytes, and blood component balances;
(10) Recognize and take appropriate corrective action for
abnormal patient responses to anesthesia, adjunctive medication, or other
forms of therapy;
(11) Participate in management of the patient while in the post-
anesthesia recovery area, including the administration of supporting fluids;
and
(12) Place special peripheral and central venous and arterial
lines for blood sampling and monitoring as appropriate.
(d)(1) The supervising anesthesiologist shall delegate only tasks and
procedures to the anesthesiologist assistant that are within the supervising
anesthesiologist’s scope of practice.
(2) The anesthesiologist assistant may work in any setting that
is within the scope of practice of the supervising anesthesiologist’s
practice.
(e) Continuity of supervision in practice settings requires the
02-13-2025 10:42:10 JMB012

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 HB1251
anesthesiologist assistant to document in the anesthesia record any change in
supervising anesthesiologist.
(f) The tasks and procedures performed by the anesthesiologist
assistant shall be documented in the appropriate medical record.

/s/L. Johnson






























02-13-2025 10:42:10 JMB012